Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.100

Votes by stickers, printed labels, rejected.

Votes cast by stickers or printed labels are not valid for any purpose and shall be rejected. Votes cast by sticker or label shall not affect the validity of other offices or issues on the voter's ballot.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1510. Prior: 1990 c 59 s 46; 1965 ex.s. c 101 s 16. Formerly RCW 29.51.175.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.